Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska32-1206
Other elections; costs.

Any election not otherwise provided for in sections 32-1203 to 32-1205 which is conducted by the election commissioner or county clerk shall be paid for by the entity holding the election.

Laws 1994, LB 76, § 371.